Tennessee statutes. Title 4 State Government
Part 21

Department of State

4-3-2101. Creation — Secretary of state as chief officer.

There is created the department of state through which the secretary of state, who shall be the chief officer of the department, shall administer the duties imposed upon the secretary of state by law.

Acts 1959, ch. 9, § 7; T.C.A., § 4-338; modified.

Cross-References. Administrative procedures division, §4-5-321.

Creation of the department of state, §4-3-101.

Secretary of state as constitutional officer, appointment, Tenn. Const., art. III, § 17.

4-3-2102. Department and secretary subject to general laws.

The secretary of state, as the chief officer of the department, and the department are subject to all laws applying generally to administrative heads of departments and administrative departments, not inconsistent with the secretary of state's status as a constitutional officer.

Acts 1959, ch. 9, § 7; T.C.A., § 4-338.

4-3-2103. Administrative attachment of state election commission.

The state election commission is hereby attached to the department of state for all administrative matters relating to receipts, disbursements, expense accounts, budget, audit and other related items. The autonomy of the state election commission and its authority are not affected hereby.

Acts 1959, ch. 9, § 7; impl. am. Acts 1972, ch. 740, § 6; T.C.A., § 4-338.

Cross-References. State election commission, title 2, ch. 11, part 1.